Utah statutes.
53A-11-402.   Mandatory reporting of prohibited acts.

If an educator has reasonable cause to believe that a student at the public school where the educator is employed has committed a prohibited act, he shall immediately report that to the school's designated educator.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1988 General Session

